src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON NUBBEGAVCCATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#gávccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#gávccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>X4#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#gávccát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#gávccát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#gávccát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e%>X4#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jn#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:i%>n#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>X4#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>X4#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#gávccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#gávccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e#gávccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e#gávccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e#gávccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:i%>X4t#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:i%>X5jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:i%>X5jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:i%>X5jn#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#gávccát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON NUBBEOVCCATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#ovccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#ovccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>X4#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#ovccát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#ovccát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#ovccát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e%>X4#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jn#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:i%>n#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>X4#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>X4#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#ovccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#ovccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e#ovccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e#ovccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e#ovccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:i%>X4t#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:i%>X5jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:i%>X5jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:i%>X5jn#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#ovccát#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON NUBBELOGATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#logát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#logát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>X4#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#logát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#logát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#logát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e%>X4#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jn#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:i%>n#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>X4#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>X4#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#logát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#logát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e#logát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e#logát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e#logát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:i%>X4t#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:i%>X5jn#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#logát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON NUBBELOGI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#lohki K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>n#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>n#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>X4#logi K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e%>X4#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jn#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:i%>n#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>X4#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>X4#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:i%>X5jde#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jd9#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jgujn#logi%>jgujn K ;




LEXICON GOLBMA   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  Case forms of the basic digits
 +Num+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4 NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X3j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd RHyph ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn K ;
 
LEXICON NOLLA   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  Case forms of nolla/nulla, as GOLBMA, but only Sg, no Cmp
 +Num+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X3j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn K ;
 

LEXICON 11TO99F   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
nubbegávccátlohkái:nubb NUBBEGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
nubbeovccátlohkái:nubb NUBBEOVCCATLOHKAI ;
nubbelogátlohkái:nubb NUBBELOGATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
nubbegávccátlohkái:nubb NUBBEGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
nubbeovccátlohkái:nubb NUBBEOVCCATLOHKAI ;
nubbelogátlohkái:nubb NUBBELOGATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON num-imprecise   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ Imprecise numbers
máŋga:máŋ'ga GOLBMA ;
máŋga+Err/Orth:maŋ'ga GOLBMA ;
máŋga+Err/Orth:mán'ga GOLBMA ;
máŋga+Err/Orth:man'ga GOLBMA ;
beal% golbma+Err/MissingSpace:beal😱#golbma GOLBMA ; !time
beal% golbma:beal% golbma GOLBMA ; !time
nolla:nol'la NOLLA ;
nulla:nul'la NOLLA ;
